test/src/morphology/N-kuernec_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kueˊrnec e-stem pöly: # Noun "kamari" - full paradigm
     kueˊrnec+A+Sg+Nom: kueˊrnec
     kueˊrnec+A+Sg+Gen: kueˊrnec
     kueˊrnec+A+Sg+Acc: kueˊrnec
     kueˊrnec+A+Sg+Ill: kueˊrnca
     kueˊrnec+A+Sg+Loc: kueˊrncest
     kueˊrnec+A+Sg+Com: kueˊrncin
     kueˊrnec+A+Ess: kueˊrncen
     kueˊrnec+A+Par: kueˊrnced
     kueˊrnec+A+Sg+Abe: kueˊrnectää
     kueˊrnec+A+Pl+Nom: kueˊrnec
     kueˊrnec+A+Pl+Gen: kueˊrnci
     kueˊrnec+A+Pl+Acc: kueˊrncid
     kueˊrnec+A+Pl+Ill: kueˊrncid
     kueˊrnec+A+Pl+Loc: kueˊrncin
     kueˊrnec+A+Pl+Com: kueˊrncivuiˊm
     kueˊrnec+A+Pl+Abe: kueˊrncitää
